Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB273.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1634 heading of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1634. Contributions by Agents; Anonymous Contributions; Cash Contributions; Preselected and Prescheduled Recurring Contributions.--* * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (d) (1) It shall be unlawful for a candidate or political committee , directly or through an agent or intermediary, to solicit or accept from a person a preselected recurring or prescheduled recurring contribution to the candidate or political committee without the express and affirmative consent of the person.(2) Express and affirmative consent of the contributor under clause (1) shall require clear and affirmative action of the contributor to make or agree to make the recurring contribution. Passive action by the contributor, including failure to uncheck a pre-checked box authorizing a recurring contribution, shall not constitute clear and affirmative action of the contributor.(3) A candidate or political committee that accepts a recurring contribution under clause (1) shall do all of the following:(i) Provide a receipt to the contributor that clearly and conspicuously discloses all terms of the recurring contribution within three (3) days after the initial contribution is received and within three (3) days after each recurring contribution is received.(ii) Provide all necessary information to cancel the recurring contribution in each communication with the contributor that concerns the contribution.(iii) Immediately cancel a recurring contribution upon request of the contributor.(4) (i) Each time a candidate or political committee solicits from a person a recurring contribution under clause (1), or accepts an initial recurring contribution under clause (1) without the express and affirmative consent of the person, shall constitute a separate violation of this subsection subject 20250SB0273PN0227 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to a penalty of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each occurrence.(ii) A candidate or political committee that accepts a recurring contribution under clause (1) without the express and affirmative consent of the person in violation of this subsection is liable for a fine not to exceed three (3) times the aggregate amount of the subsequent recurring contributions received if all of the following conditions are satisfied:(A) The candidate or political committee knew or should have known that the solicitation required express and affirmative consent.(B) The candidate or political committee knew or should have known that the contributor did not provide express and affirmative consent for making the recurring contributions.(C) The recurring contributions, in the aggregate, exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).(5) A recurring contribution under clause (1) accepted without the express and affirmative consent of the person shall be returned to the contributor within fourteen (14) days of the earlier of the receipt of a request from the contributor to return the contribution or the date on which the candidate or political committee becomes aware that the solicitation of the recurring contribution was in violation of this subsection. A contribution accepted after a contributor requested to cancel a recurring contribution shall be returned to the contributor within fourteen (14) days of the request to cancel the recurring contribution.(6) For purposes of this subsection, the term "recurring contribution" means a contribution from a person to a candidate or political committee that is automatically charged to the 20250SB0273PN0227 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 person's bank account, credit card or other payment account on a repeated basis without subsequent approval or any other subsequent express and affirmative consent by the person after the person's initial contribution to the candidate or political committee.(7) This subsection shall apply to contributions occurring or solicited on or after the effective date of this clause.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0273PN0227 - 4 - 12345678